Wisconsin, session 2025, AB333.
do enact as follows:AB333,11Section 1. 20.835 (2) (er) of the statutes is created to read:AB333,2,3220.835 (2) (er) Bicycle credit. A sum sufficient to make the payments under s. 371.07 (8w).AB333,24Section 2. 71.07 (8w) of the statutes is created to read:AB333,2,5571.07 (8w) Bicycle credit. (a) Definitions. In this subsection:AB333,2,861. “Claimant” means an individual whose family income does not exceed 200 7percent of the federal poverty line established under 42 USC 9902 (2) for a family 8the size of the individual’s family and who files a claim under this subsection.AB333,2,1092. “Dependent” has the meaning given in section 152 of the Internal Revenue 10Code.AB333,2,1911(b) Filing claims. Subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, for 12taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, a claimant may claim as a credit 13against the tax imposed under s. 71.02 an amount equal to the amount paid in the 14taxable year to purchase a bicycle, including an electric bicycle, for a dependent of 15the claimant. If the allowable amount of the claim under this paragraph exceeds 16the tax otherwise due under s. 71.02, the amount of the claim not used to offset the 17tax due shall be certified by the department of revenue to the department of 18administration for payment by check, share draft, or other draft drawn from the 19appropriation under s. 20.835 (2) (er).AB333,2,2120(c) Limitations. 1. The maximum credit that a claimant may claim each year 21under this subsection is $200 per dependent of the claimant.AB333,3,2222. A claimant shall submit with the claimant’s return any documentation 1required by the department regarding the amount paid for each bicycle for which a 2credit is claimed under this subsection.AB333,3,433. No credit may be claimed under this subsection by a part-year resident or a 4nonresident of this state.AB333,3,654. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless it is claimed within 6the period specified in s. 71.75 (2).AB333,3,975. No credit may be allowed under this subsection for a taxable year covering 8a period of less than 12 months, except for a taxable year closed by reason of the 9death of the taxpayer.AB333,3,1110(d) Administration. Subsection (9e) (d), to the extent that it applies to the 11credit under that subsection, applies to the credit under this subsection.AB333,312Section 3. 71.10 (4) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:AB333,3,211371.10 (4) (i) The total of claim of right credit under s. 71.07 (1), farmland 14preservation credit under ss. 71.57 to 71.61, farmland preservation credit, 2010 and 15beyond under s. 71.613, homestead credit under subch. VIII, jobs tax credit under s. 1671.07 (3q), business development credit under s. 71.07 (3y), research credit under s. 1771.07 (4k) (e) 2. a., veterans and surviving spouses property tax credit under s. 1871.07 (6e), bicycle credit under s. 71.07 (8w), enterprise zone jobs credit under s. 1971.07 (3w), electronics and information technology manufacturing zone credit 20under s. 71.07 (3wm), earned income tax credit under s. 71.07 (9e), estimated tax 21payments under s. 71.09, and taxes withheld under subch. X.AB333,3,2222